Massachusetts, session 194th, H4254.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including the
provisions of Chapter 43 of the Acts of 2007, the City of Boston Police Department shall waive
the maximum age requirement for original appointment of police officers for Rodney Alcindor.
If Rodney Alcindor meets all other requirements set forth by the Boston Police Department, he
shall be eligible to have his name certified for original appointment to the position of police
officer.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1